Idaho, session 2025, H0461.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 72-1204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1204. IDAHO LAUNCH GRANT PROGRAM AND IN-DEMAND CAREERS FUND -- DEF-
INITIONS. (1) As used in this section through section 72-1206, Idaho Code:
(a) "Advisory board" means the Idaho launch grant program advisory
board established in this chapter.
(a) (b) "Board" means the state board of education.
(b) "Council" means the workforce development council established in
this chapter.
(c) "Eligible adult learner" means an Idaho resident who is pursuing
education or training for an in-demand career.
(d) "Eligible coursework" means courses or training necessary for the
completion of a participant's declared in-demand career. Beginning
with the spring 2026 graduating class, eligible coursework shall mean
only the education, certification, or training necessary for the com-
pletion of a participant's declared in-demand career:
(i) Requiring no more than an associate degree;
(ii) Requiring a certificate or training of two (2) years of full-
time equivalent time or less;
(iii) Requiring an apprenticeship in the trades; or
(iv) That is a health care, engineering, or information technol-
ogy career that does not require a postbaccalaureate degree.
(e) "Eligible education expenses" means student tuition and fees at an
eligible institution for eligible coursework; however, in no case shall
the council advisory board reimburse more than eighty percent (80%) of
a program's total tuition and fees or more than eight thousand dollars
($8,000), whichever is less.
(f) "Eligible institution" means a training provider as recognized by
the council under the workforce innovation and opportunity act or the
workforce development training fund advisory board. Eligible institu-
tion also means a community college established pursuant to the provi-
sions of chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code. Eligible institutions shall
comply with the provisions of section 33-138, Idaho Code, related to
dignity and nondiscrimination in public education, provided that any


provisions relating to religion shall not apply to parochial institu-
tions. Eligible institutions shall also comply with the provisions of
section 67-5909C, Idaho Code, relating to diversity statements in pub-
lic postsecondary education.
(g) "Eligible student" means a student who:
(i) Is an Idaho resident;
(ii) Will graduate from an accredited high school or its equiva-
lent in Idaho as determined by the board beginning with the spring
2024 graduating class;
(iii) Has enrolled in or applied to an eligible institution and be-
gins enrollment in the fall semester following graduation, unless
the council executive director grants an extension for extenuat-
ing circumstances such as those outlined as provided in section
72-1205, Idaho Code; and
(iv) Has used next steps Idaho or an equivalent career exploration
program accepted by the council advisory board and has completed
a career pathway plan that meets the minimum requirements estab-
lished by the council advisory board.
(h) "Executive director" means the executive director of the workforce
development council pursuant to section 72-1201, Idaho Code.
(h) (i) "Grant" means an amount to be determined by the council advisory
board that shall not exceed eight thousand dollars ($8,000) per eligi-
ble student.
(i) (j) "Grant distribution platform" means a digital platform through
which grant funds are transferred from the council by the executive di-
rector to the account of a participant to be used for eligible education
expenses.
(j) (k) "In-demand careers" means careers that have a positive economic
output for the state of Idaho and increase economic mobility for the
people of Idaho. Factors including but not limited to the number of job
openings, the rate of job growth, and the length of the training program
shall be incorporated to create a matrix of careers and training pro-
grams that align to in-demand careers. Careers that require a postbac-
calaureate degree for entry into the profession shall not be included
in the matrix or as an in-demand career include the careers determined
by the advisory board criteria pursuant to section 72-1205(2)(b), Idaho
Code.
(k) (l) "Participant" means an Idaho resident for whom a grant is
awarded under section 72-1205, Idaho Code, and who has met the minimum
academic standards of, and has been accepted into, an eligible institu-
tion.
(l) (m) "Program" means the Idaho launch grant program established by
section 72-1205, Idaho Code.
(m) (n) "Resident" means an individual meeting legal residency re-
quirements as defined in section 33-3717B, Idaho Code.
(2) The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no force
and effect on and after July 1, 2029.
SECTION 2. That Section 72-1205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


72-1205. IDAHO LAUNCH GRANT PROGRAM. (1) There is hereby established
the Idaho launch grant program to be administered by the council executive
director according to the provisions of this section. There is also hereby
established the Idaho launch grant program advisory board that shall ensure
the efficient administration of the program. The purpose of the program is
to provide education grants for eligible students.
(2)(a) The advisory board shall consist of three (3) members of the
house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of repre-
sentatives, three (3) members of the senate appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate, and three (3) members of the public appointed
by the governor.
(b) The advisory board shall select the criteria that will be used to
determine in-demand careers by considering:
(i) Careers that have a positive economic output for the state of
Idaho and that increase economic mobility for the people of Idaho;
and
(ii) Factors including but not limited to the number of job open-
ings, the rate of job growth, the median salary or wage for a career
that is in the top three (3) highest quartiles for Idaho salaries
and wages, and the length of training programs. These factors
shall be incorporated to create a matrix of careers and training
programs that align to in-demand careers. Careers that require a
postbaccalaureate degree for entry into the profession shall not
be included in the matrix or as an in-demand career.
(c) The advisory board shall submit a report with any recommenda-
tions for improving the efficiency of the program to the legislature by
September 1 of each year.
(2) (3) In order to administer the program, the council executive di-
rector shall consult with any necessary agencies to:
(a) Create and administer, or designate a third party to create and ad-
minister, a grant distribution platform;
(b) Establish a grant application process for eligible students. To
ensure eligible students receive notification prior to postsecondary
institution enrollment deadlines, the council executive director may
stagger applications so that initial grant awards are announced by De-
cember 31 in the year preceding an eligible student's graduation from
high school and that additional grant awards be made no later than June
30 of the academic year the eligible student graduates from high school.
Additional grant award announcements may be made after such date based
on the availability of funds;
(c) Award grants to eligible students for eligible education expenses
at eligible institutions, subject to legislative appropriation and to
the following conditions, beginning with the graduating class of 2025:
(i) If eligible student applications exceed available funding in
a fiscal year, grant awards shall be prioritized first based on the
pursuit of an in-demand career and based on the highest rankings in
the matrix established pursuant to section 72-1204(j), Idaho Code
the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(ii) If additional funds remain, prioritization shall then be
based on an eligible student's financial need as verified by the


Idaho state tax commission using the prior year's tax return,
most recent income documents, or other criteria determined by
the workforce development council established in this chapter
advisory board; and
(iii) If available funding in a fiscal year exceeds eligible stu-
dents, any unused appropriations may be used in accordance with
section 72-1206(4), Idaho Code; and
(d) Take other such actions as are necessary to implement and enforce
the provisions of this section.
(3) (4) Participants must expend all grant funds within three (3) years
of the award date. Any remaining funds after a break in enrollment exceeding
six (6) months or unused funds at the end of the three (3) year period shall
revert to the in-demand careers fund established in section 72-1206, Idaho
Code. The council or its designated staff may grant an extension or excep-
tion by demonstrating to the council an extenuating circumstance, includ-
ing but not limited to religious service, military service, structured vol-
unteer service, or health or medical issues. The executive director shall
grant an extension or exception for participants who are engaged in mili-
tary service to the United States or the state of Idaho or engaged in reli-
gious service. The executive director may grant an extension or exception
for a participant demonstrating other extenuating circumstances as estab-
lished by the advisory board, including but not limited to structured volun-
teer service or health or medical issues.
(4) (5) No more than one half (1/2) of the initial grant award may be ex-
pended by a participant in any academic year; provided, however, that this
subsection shall not apply:
(a) To a participant in a program that is less than twelve (12) months in
length; or
(b) In other extenuating circumstances as determined by the council
advisory board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(5) (6) Grant awards shall be capped at one (1) grant per eligible stu-
dent.
(6) (7) The council advisory board shall adopt policies outlining trig-
gering events that may lead to earlier reversion of student grants or repay-
ment grants, including but not limited to unsatisfactory academic progress,
expulsion, or transfer to an out-of-state program prior to attainment of a
credential or degree. Any reverted or repaid grants shall be paid to the
in-demand careers fund established in section 72-1206, Idaho Code.
(7) (8) The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no
force and effect on and after July 1, 2029.
SECTION 3. That Section 72-1206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1206. IN-DEMAND CAREERS FUND. (1) There is hereby established in
the state treasury the in-demand careers fund.
(2) Moneys in the in-demand careers fund are subject to legislative ap-
propriation and shall consist of the following:
(a) Legislative appropriations;
(b) Donations and contributions made to the fund;
(c) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund;


(d) Moneys transferred pursuant to section 63-3638(17), Idaho Code;
and
(e) Moneys reverted or repaid to the fund pursuant to section 72-1205,
Idaho Code.
(3) The in-demand careers fund shall be used to award grants as outlined
in section 72-1205, Idaho Code.
(4) When the available appropriation in a fiscal year exceeds partici-
pants, the council may executive director shall use excess moneys as follows
in the following order of priority:
(a) For eligible students pursuing health care careers that would be
in-demand careers but for the requirement of a postbaccalaureate de-
gree, excluding careers funded through the state board of education's
budget for health care programs;
(b) Up Pursuant to the advisory board, up to ten million dollars
($10,000,000) of the remaining appropriation may be used to provide en-
hanced grant funding to either eligible students or, of which up to five
million dollars ($5,000,000) may be used for eligible adult learners
based upon on the following conditions:
(i) If potential awards from the council exceed available funding
from the enhanced grants, awards shall be prioritized first based
on the pursuit of in-demand careers; and
(ii) If, following the prioritization provided for in subpara-
graph (i) of this paragraph, additional moneys remain for awards,
prioritization shall then be based on financial need.; and
(b) The remaining appropriation shall be retained in the fund and
be subject to legislative appropriation in subsequent legislative
sessions for the purposes of expanding in-demand career training oppor-
tunities.
(c) For Idaho opportunity scholarships awarded pursuant to section
33-4303, Idaho Code, to eligible students pursuing in-demand careers
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(5) By January 1 each year, the council executive director shall report
sufficient data to the legislature regarding:
(a) The number and demographics of eligible students applying for
grants;
(b) The number and type of eligible institutions approved by the
council advisory board;
(c) The list and matrix of in-demand careers prioritized by the
matrix and verified by the council pursuant to section 72-1204(j)
72-1205(2)(b), Idaho Code;
(d) The number of grants awarded, the number of grants reverted, and de-
mographics of participants; and
(e) Data to demonstrate the effectiveness of the program, including
but not limited to program completion rates, satisfactory academic
progress, job placement rates, and retention rates of participants in
Idaho upon program completion.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.